Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2529
Public agencies; powers.

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply the board, joint public agency, or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing such personnel or services therefor as it may employ or contract to furnish.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 29.